Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297A.67, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Baby products. Breast pumps, baby bottles and nipples, pacifiers, teething rings, deleted text begin anddeleted text end infant syringesnew text begin , baby wipes, cribs and bassinets, crib and bassinet mattresses, crib and bassinet sheets, changing tables, changing pads, strollers, car seats and car seat bases, baby swings, bottle sterilizers, and infant eating utensilsnew text end are exempt. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after June 30, 2025. new text end